Hawaii statutes.
§6F-3 Executive board. (a) The
responsibility for general administration and the proper operation of the
center shall be vested in an executive board to be known as the board of the
judiciary history center. The board shall have power in accordance with law to
formulate policy and to exercise control over the center. The board shall
consist of five members appointed by the chief justice; provided that three
members shall be selected from a list of seven candidates submitted by the
friends of the judiciary history center. The term of each member shall be for
four years, commencing on July 1, and expiring on June 30; provided that of the
five members appointed for terms commencing July 1, 1990, two members shall
serve for four years, two members shall serve for three years, and one member
shall serve for two years. The members shall serve without compensation but
they shall be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in
the performance of their official duties.

(b) A vacancy on the board shall be filled for
the remainder of the unexpired term or, if expired, for a new term by the chief
justice; provided that a vacancy in any one of the three positions originally
appointed by the chief justice from a list submitted by the friends of the
judiciary history center shall be filled by the chief justice from a list of
three candidates submitted by the friends of the judiciary history center. [L
1990, c 211, pt of §3; am L 2008, c 27, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next